New York, session 2025-2026, A6717.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the commissioner of motor vehicles, in conjunction with the office of 3 court administration, shall redesign the uniform traffic tickets. Such 4 new design shall include, but not be limited to, increasing the clarity 5 of such ticket and providing clearly on the front of such ticket, the 6 cancellation of the court appearance where a fine is paid prior to the 7 date of such court appearance. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 9 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 10 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 11 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or 12 before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09544-01-5